Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201017-720
Certificates of deposit; time deposits;
security required.

The city or village treasurer of cities
of the second class and villages may, upon resolution of the mayor and council
or board of trustees authorizing the same, purchase certificates of deposit
from and make time deposits in any bank, capital stock financial institution,
or qualifying mutual financial institution in the State of Nebraska to the
extent that such certificates of deposit or time deposits are insured or guaranteed by the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation. Deposits may be made in excess of the amounts
so secured by the corporation, and the amount of the excess deposit shall
be secured by a bond or by security given in the same manner as is provided
for cities of the first class in sections 16-714 to 16-716 as of the time
the deposit is made. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock
financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying
mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1969, c. 84, § 1, p. 424;

Laws 1987, LB 440, § 8;

Laws 1990, LB 825, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 157, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 23;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 25;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 11.